New York, session 2025-2026, S4943.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 73-b to read as follows: 3 § 73-b. Power outage credit. Every electric corporation and gas corpo- 4 ration in this state shall provide its customers with a credit to such 5 customers' accounts at any time a customer is without power for a period 6 of time in excess of twenty-four hours. Such credit shall be in the 7 amount of one hundred dollars for each twenty-four hour period that a 8 customer is without power and shall only be credited to the account of 9 each customer of such corporation who has been without power for such 10 period of time. Credit to a customer's account made pursuant to this 11 section shall be used to pay charges against such account assessed by 12 the electric corporation or gas corporation and such customer shall not 13 be required to pay on such account until such credit has been completely 14 exhausted. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05997-01-5